Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.070

Notice of hearing on proposal—Publication—Contents.

The director shall publish notice of any hearing called for the purpose of considering and acting upon any proposal for a period of not less than two days in one or more newspapers of general circulation as the director may prescribe. No such public hearing shall be held prior to five days after the last day of such period of publication. Such notice shall set forth the date, time and place of said hearing, the agricultural commodity and the area covered by such proposal; a concise statement of the proposal; a concise statement of each additional subject upon which the director will hear evidence and make a determination, and a statement that, and the address where, copies of the proposal may be obtained. The director shall also mail notice to all producers and handlers within the affected area who may be directly affected by such proposal and whose names and addresses appear, on the day next preceding the day on which such notice is published, upon lists of such persons then on file in the department.

[ 2002 c 313 s 8; 1987 c 393 s 5; 1985 c 261 s 2; 1979 c 154 s 4; 1961 c 256 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.

Severability—1979 c 154: See note following RCW 15.49.330.